Utah statutes.
17B-1-1304.   Petition requirements.
(1)  Each petition under Subsection 17B-1-1303(1)(a) or (2) shall:
(a)  indicate the typed or printed name and current residence address of each
owner of acre-feet of water, property owner, or registered voter signing the
petition;
(b)  if it is a petition signed by the owners of acre-feet of water or
property owners, indicate the address of the property as to which the owner is
signing;
(c)  designate up to three signers of the petition as sponsors, one of whom
shall be designated the contact sponsor, with the mailing address and
telephone number of each; and
(d)  be filed with the clerk.
(2)  A signer of a petition to dissolve a local district may withdraw, or,
once withdrawn, reinstate the signer's signature at any time until 30 days
after the public hearing under Section 17B-1-1306.
